Wyoming statutes. Title 9 Administration of the Government
Article 27. Substance Abuse Control Plan

Cross references. —

For similar provisions, see §

9-2-122

.

For provisions pertaining to addicted offender accountability, see §

7-13-1301

et seq.

For provisions pertaining to compliance checks, see §

12-6-103

.

Editor's notes. —

Both Laws 2002, Sp. Sess., ch. 81, § 1, and Laws 2002, Sp. Sess., ch. 100, § 1, enacted an article 26 in chapter 2 of this title. The provisions enacted by ch. 81, § 1, have been redesignated as article 27 (§§

9-2-2701

through

9-2-2707

.)

§ 9-2-2701.
Substance abuse control plan.

The legislature hereby finds that the state of Wyoming has significant problems stemming from the abuse of alcohol and other drugs. In order to confront this challenge it is necessary to implement a comprehensive, integrated substance abuse control plan.

The department of health shall, in consultation with the department of education, department of family services, department of workforce services and department of corrections adopt rules and regulations establishing standards for the effective treatment and prevention of substance abuse. The rules shall be adopted by December 31, 2002, and shall include standards for providers, programs and facilities. The rules shall include procedures for data collection and analysis, protocols for testing and methods of measuring outcomes. The rules shall require the use of best practices, establish the means for determining priorities for treatment and prevention services, set standards for managing wait lists of patients and establish standards for cross training and continuing education of personnel. The rules shall specify certification requirements for programs, providers and facilities. The rules and regulations shall establish a process for denying continued funding for programs or providers who fail to comply with certification requirements established under this section. The rules and regulations establishing standards for treatment programs in state correctional facilities and the secure facilities authorized under W.S.

9-2-2704

shall be promulgated by the department of corrections, in consultation with the department of health, department of education, department of family services and department of workforce services no later than December 31, 2002.

The department of health shall certify programs, providers and facilities which meet the requirements of the rules and regulations adopted under subsection (b) of this section provided the department of corrections and department of health shall certify programs in state correctional facilities and the secure treatment facilities authorized pursuant to W.S.

9-2-2704

. Beginning July 1, 2004, no state funds provided for substance abuse treatment shall be allocated to programs, providers or facilities which are not certified by the department of health. Beginning July 1, 2004, courts shall not refer individuals for substance abuse or related treatment to programs, providers or facilities which are not certified to provide those services for which the individual is referred.

The department of health shall have the authority to contract with a private entity to conduct compliance reviews, quality assurance checks and other related services.

The department of health may allow exceptions to the requirements of rules adopted pursuant to subsection (b) of this section relating to the use of best practices to permit bona fide research to develop new effective treatment, intervention and prevention.

Repealed by Laws 2015, ch. 59 § 2.

History.

Laws 2002, Sp. Sess., ch. 81, § 1; 2008, ch. 44, § 1; 2015 ch. 59, § 2, effective February 26, 2015.

The 2008 amendment,

deleted the former last sentence of (b), which read: “Rules and regulations establishing standards for those programs reviewed pursuant to
W.S.

9-2-2705

shall be adopted no later than July 1, 2004.”; and deleted “the joint labor, health and social services interim committee and” following “synopsis of those rules to” in (f).

Laws 2008, ch. 44, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
art. 4, § 8, of the Wyo. Const. Approved March 5, 2008.

The 2015 amendment,

deleted former (f), which read: “No later than forty-five (45) days prior to the adoption of new rules under this act, the department of health shall provide notice of intent to adopt the rules, a copy of the proposed rules and a synopsis of those rules to the joint judiciary interim committee.”

Laws 2015, ch. 59, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 25, 2015.

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2008, ch. 44, § 3, provides: “Any other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 9-2-2702(a)(vii).

§ 9-2-2702.
Definitions.

As used in this act:

“Best practices” means intentional methods, procedures or systems that produce consistent, cost-effective prevention or treatment outcomes, which have been validated in replicated randomized control group studies or high quality time series studies, published or reported in reputable scholarly sources. In the absence of high quality research studies, a practice or approach may be selected on the basis of the consensus of prevailing scientific opinion or theory-based procedures published in peer-reviewed journals, until the best practices data are available;

“Cross training” means acquisition of skills to implement or use prevention, intervention or treatment procedures from different roles, disciplines or perspectives with the intent of improving overall, effective treatment or prevention outcomes. Cross training does not include the acquisition of licensure in another discipline;

“Patient” means any individual or client for whom confidential medical or psychological records are kept as a part of the provision of treatment or prevention services;

“Programs and facilities” means coordinated and planned activities or services that receive financial consideration from any source including third party payments or grants for the provision of treatment of prevention services and scientifically related problems, provided however, the term does not include public workshops, public speeches, courses or workshops not holding themselves out as intending to provide therapeutic services;

“Provider” means any individual, partnership, corporation or organization that receives financial consideration from any source including third party payments or grants for the purpose of treatment or prevention services targeting substance abuse or other scientifically related problems such as delinquency, school failure, mental illness or criminal behavior;

“Therapeutic community” means a comprehensive, research based method of substance abuse and cognitive behavioral treatment, effectively preparing the client for reentry into society;

“This act” means W.S

9-2-2701

through

9-2-2704

.

History.

Laws 2002, Sp. Sess., ch. 81, § 1; 2008, ch. 44, § 1; 2015 ch. 59, § 1, effective February 26, 2015.

The 2008 amendment,

substituted “9-2-2706” for “9-2-2707” in (a)(vii).

Laws 2008, ch. 44, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, of the Wyo. Const. Approved March 5, 2008.

The 2015 amendment,

in (a)(vii), substituted “9-2-2704” for “9-2-2706”

Laws 2015, ch. 59, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 25, 2015.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2008, ch. 44, § 3, provides: “Any other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

§ 9-2-2703.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2002, Sp. Sess., ch. 81, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

This section related to a grants assistance pilot program. It was repealed pursuant to its own terms effective July 1, 2004.

§ 9-2-2704.
Secure substance abuse treatment.

The department of corrections is authorized to contract with an entity for the provision of secure substance abuse treatment in Wyoming for persons in the custody of the department of corrections subject to the following:

The entity providing the treatment and the facility where it is provided shall be selected in a competitive process following a request for proposals issued by the department of corrections. The proposal selected shall best serve the interests of the state of Wyoming and shall be evaluated by the department of corrections and the department of health on the basis of:

Cost determined by the per diem cost to the state for inmates treated plus other costs incurred by the state;

The quality and appropriateness of the treatment proposed to be provided including the extent to which an effective therapeutic community will be formed within the facility;

The relevant experience of the entity providing the treatment;

The security of the facility;

The location of the proposed facility and the compliance of the location with local zoning and land use planning;

The speed with which the proposed facility can be made available for use;

Arrangements for transporting prisoners to and from the facility; and

Any other factors the department of corrections deems relevant as determined by rules adopted by the department of corrections.

The contract shall be for a period specified in the contract which shall not exceed ten (10) years;

The contract shall state that the department of corrections may terminate the contract due to:

Unsatisfactory performance by the entity;

For breach of contract; or

Failure of the department of corrections to receive an adequate appropriation.

After an initial period specified in the contract the entity may terminate the contract for failure to receive an adequate reimbursement for the services provided. The contract shall contain a mechanism for negotiating an increase in reimbursement due to inflation in costs or changes in programming, but the increase shall be subject to the availability of appropriations;

The contract shall provide that the entity has the right to return to the department of corrections at an institution identified by the department any inmate who:

Poses an undue danger to other inmates or the staff;

Fails to obey the rules of the program; or

Is unwilling or unable to participate in the treatment program or does not make a good faith effort to progress in the treatment program.

The initial facility shall be for one hundred (100) beds to be contracted by the state of Wyoming. The facility may, with the consent of the department of corrections, have other beds for inmates from other governmental jurisdictions.

The department of corrections may subsequently make a long term contract for additional treatment beds at the initial or additional facilities provided the additional treatment beds are specifically authorized in an enacted general appropriations bill. The department of corrections may enter into contracts of less than two (2) years for additional beds within a facility.

Unless delayed for good cause, the department of corrections shall issue the request for proposal authorized by subsection (a) of this section within ninety (90) days of the effective date of this act and shall seek to have a facility in place in operation during the fiscal year commencing July 1, 2003.

The department of corrections may assign any inmate in its custody to a secure treatment facility up to the capacity provided by the contract. Assignment to the facility is at the discretion of the department of corrections and is not the right of any inmate.

The provisions of W.S

7-22-101

through

7-22-115

do not apply to a secure substance abuse treatment facility created under this section except that the following provisions shall apply:

W.S.

7-22-105

to the extent that American correctional association standards are appropriate for the secure substance abuse facility;

W.S.

7-22-106

;

W.S.

7-22-107

;

W.S.

7-22-109

;

W.S.

7-22-110

;

W.S. 7-22-112(a)(iv) through (ix).

History.

Laws 2002, Sp. Sess., ch. 81, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 9-2-2702(a)(vii).

§ 9-2-2705.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2008, ch. 44, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 2002, Sp. Sess., ch. 61, § 1, related to an independent review of adolescent treatment programs.

Laws 2008, ch. 44, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, of the Wyo. Const. Approved March 5, 2008.

§ 9-2-2706.
Annual report required. [Repealed]

History.

Laws 2002, Sp. Sess., ch. 81, § 1; Laws 2015, ch. 59, § 2.

§ 9-2-2707.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2008, ch. 44, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 2002, Sp. Sess., ch. 81, § 1, related to joint authorized studies of children of incarcerated persons and offenders who reenter the community.

Laws 2008, ch. 44, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, of the Wyo. Const. Approved March 5, 2008.

§ 9-2-2708.
Methamphetamine and substance abuse treatment grants.

Public or private entities may apply for grants to fund access to treatment for persons addicted to methamphetamine and other substances. Grant requests shall be reviewed and awarded by the department of health. Any funds awarded under this section shall not be used to supplant funds being used at the time of the award by the public or private entity for the purposes specified in this section.

In reviewing and awarding grants under this section, the department of health shall consider:

Geographic distribution of treatment resources;

A projection of the number of persons who will be treated, using law enforcement statistics with respect to the number of arrests for methamphetamine use and other arrests related to substance abuse in each region of the state and other data demonstrating need;

The amount of monies or other forms of contribution public or private entities will provide in matching funds. This local match shall be in an amount of not less than one dollar ($1.00) for every three dollars ($3.00) of state funds provided.

The department of health shall prepare a request for proposal and solicit proposals from interested public and private entities to increase access to treatment for those who are addicted to methamphetamine and other substances. The request for proposal shall:

Solicit proposals to provide treatment as set forth in this subsection;

Require that proposals include an amount of monies or other forms of contributions that public or private entities will provide in matching funds. This local match shall be in an amount of not less than one dollar ($1.00) for every three dollars ($3.00) of state funds provided;

Require the proposals to set forth the manner in which the on-going operations of the program will be financially sustained;

Include other provisions as may be deemed appropriate by the department of health.

Funding requests by the department of health for the purposes identified in this section shall be presented as a separate and specific program in any budget request prepared by the department and submitted by the governor pursuant to W.S.

9-2-1011

and

9-2-1012

, and not continued with any other program.

History.

Laws 2011, ch. 114, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2011, ch. 114 § 2, provides: “For the fiscal year commencing July 1, 2011, any funds remaining from state appropriations to the department of health which had been included in the department's budget requests to be expended for purposes specified in 2005 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 245, shall be expended only as provided in this section.”

Effective dates. —

Laws 2011, ch. 114, § 4, makes the act effective July 1, 2011.